Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 5. Reservation of Rights to Alaska.

Sec. 38.05.125.
Reservation.

Each contract for the sale, lease, or grant of state land, and each deed to state land, properties, or interest in state land, made under AS

38.05.045

—

38.05.120

,

38.05.321

,

38.05.810

—

38.05.825

, AS 38.08, or AS 38.50 except as provided in AS

38.50.050

is subject to the following reservations: “The party of the first part, Alaska, hereby expressly saves, excepts and reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its lessees, successors, and assigns forever, all oils, gases, coal, ores, minerals, fissionable materials, geothermal resources, and fossils of every name, kind or description, and which may be in or upon said land above described, or any part thereof, and the right to explore the same for such oils, gases, coal, ores, minerals, fissionable materials, geothermal resources, and fossils, and it also hereby expressly saves and reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its lessees, successors, and assigns forever, the right to enter by itself, its or their agents, attorneys, and servants upon said land, or any part or parts thereof, at any and all times for the purpose of opening, developing, drilling, and working mines or wells on these or other land and taking out and removing therefrom all such oils, gases, coal, ores, minerals, fissionable materials, geothermal resources, and fossils, and to that end it further expressly reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its lessees, successors, and assigns forever, the right by its or their agents, servants and attorneys at any and all times to erect, construct, maintain, and use all such buildings, machinery, roads, pipelines, powerlines, and railroads, sink such shafts, drill such wells, remove such soil, and to remain on said land or any part thereof for the foregoing purposes and to occupy as much of said land as may be necessary or convenient for such purposes hereby expressly reserving to itself, its lessees, successors, and assigns, as aforesaid, generally all rights and power in, to, and over said land, whether herein expressed or not, reasonably necessary or convenient to render beneficial and efficient the complete enjoyment of the property and rights hereby expressly reserved.”

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a quitclaim of land or a transfer of an interest in land made under AS

38.05.035(b)(9)

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the transfer of ownership and management of University of Alaska trust land from the Department of Natural Resources to the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska under ch. 22, SLA 1983 includes the mineral estate of the state in the land.

History.

(§ 1 art VII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 14 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1995)

Sec. 38.05.126.
Navigable and public water.

The people of the state have a constitutional right to free access to and use of the navigable or public water of the state.

The state has full power and control of all of the navigable or public water of the state, both meandered and unmeandered, and the state holds and controls all navigable or public water in trust for the use of the people of the state.

Ownership of land bordering navigable or public water does not grant an exclusive right to the use of the water and a right of title to the land below the ordinary high water mark is subject to the rights of the people of the state to use and have access to the water for recreational purposes or other public purposes for which the water is used or capable of being used consistent with the public trust.

This section may not be construed to affect or abridge valid existing rights or create a right or privilege of the public to cross or enter private land.

History.

(§ 4 ch 56 SLA 1999)

Sec. 38.05.127.
Access to navigable or public water.

Before the sale, lease, grant, or other disposal of any interest in state land adjacent to a body of water or waterway, the commissioner shall,

determine if the body of water or waterway is navigable water, public water, or neither;

upon finding that the body of water or waterway is navigable or public water, provide for the specific easements or rights-of-way necessary to ensure free access to and along the body of water, unless the commissioner finds that regulating or limiting access is necessary for other beneficial uses or public purposes.

The department shall adopt regulations implementing this section.

Nothing in this section affects valid existing rights or limits in any way the constitutional right of the public to use and have free access to the navigable or public waters of the state.

Upon application by a municipality or an affected owner of land, the department may vacate, release, modify, or relocate an easement and right-of-way for public access to or along navigable or public waters reserved by the department in a patent issued under AS 29.65 or former AS 29.18, if the commissioner determines the action is consistent with the public interest.

The establishment of easements or rights-of-way for oil and gas, gas only, and mineral leases under (a) of this section need not be made until the leases are ready to be developed.

Rights-of-way or easements to waterways established under (a)(2) of this section shall be established approximately once each mile unless the commissioner makes a written finding that regulating or limiting access is necessary for other beneficial uses or public purposes.

The commissioner may exchange land under AS 38.50 to create access to public water of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 117 SLA 1976; am § 32 ch 113 SLA 1981; am §§ 37, 38 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 57 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 53 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

Sec. 38.05.128.
Obstructions to navigable water.

A person may not obstruct or interfere with the free passage or use by a person of any navigable water unless the obstruction or interference is

authorized by law or regulation or by a permit issued by a state agency;

exempt under 33 U.S.C. 1344(f) (Clean Water Act);

caused by the normal operation of freight barging that is otherwise consistent with law; or

authorized by the commissioner after reasonable public notice.

An unauthorized obstruction or interference is a public nuisance and is subject to abatement. The cost of abatement shall be borne by the violator and is in addition to any penalty imposed by the court.

This section may not be construed to affect or abridge valid existing rights.

Free passage or use of any navigable water includes the right to use land below the ordinary high water mark to the extent reasonably necessary to use the navigable water consistent with the public trust.

Free passage or use of any navigable water includes the right to enter adjacent land above the ordinary high water mark as necessary to portage around obstacles or obstructions to travel on the water, provided

entry is made without injury or damage to the land;

entry is made in the least obtrusive manner possible;

there is no reasonable alternative available to avoid the use of the adjacent land above the ordinary high water mark; and

the navigable water is reentered immediately below the obstacle or obstruction at the nearest point where it is safe to do so.

A violation of (a) of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 1985; am §§ 5, 6 ch 56 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (f), respectively.
Relettered in 1999, at which time former (b) was relettered as (f) and former (c) and (d) were relettered as (b) and (c), respectively.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 31, 2016, in (a)(1), substituted “law or regulation or by a permit issued by a” for “federal agency and a”, in (a)(2), deleted “authorized under a federal or state law or permit;”; redesignated (4) and (5) as (3) and (4).

Sec. 38.05.130.
Damages and posting of bond.

Rights may not be exercised by the state, its lessees, successors, or assigns under the reservation as set out in AS

38.05.125

until the state, its lessees, successors, or assigns make provision to pay the owner of the land full payment for all damages sustained by the owner, by reason of entering upon the land.
If the owner for any cause refuses or neglects to settle the damages, the state, its lessees, successors, assigns, or an applicant for a lease or contract from the state for the purpose of prospecting for valuable minerals, or option, contract, or lease for mining coal or lease for extracting geothermal resources, petroleum, or natural gas, may enter upon the land in the exercise of the reserved rights after posting a surety bond determined by the director, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, to be sufficient as to form, amount, and security to secure to the owner payment for damages, and may institute legal proceedings in a court where the land is located, as may be necessary to determine the damages which the owner may suffer.

History.

(§ 2 art VII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 175 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

For geothermal leasing, see 11 AAC 84, art. 7.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.